Utah statutes.
17B-1-308.   Boards of trustees comprised of county or municipal legislative
body members.
(1)  If a county or municipal legislative body by statute also serves as the
board of trustees of a local district:
(a)  the board of trustees shall hold district meetings and keep district
minutes, accounts, and other records separate from those of the county or
municipality;
(b)  subject to Subsection (2), the board of trustees may use, respectively,
existing county or municipal facilities and personnel for district purposes;
(c)  notwithstanding Subsections 17B-1-303(1) and (2), the term of office of
each board of trustees member coincides with the member's term as a county or
municipal legislative body member;
(d)  each board of trustees member represents the district at large; and
(e)  board members may not receive compensation for their service as board
members in addition to compensation they receive as members of a county or
municipal legislative body.
(2)  The county or municipal legislative body, as the case may be, shall
charge the local district, and the local district shall pay to the county or
municipality, a reasonable amount for:
(a)  the county or municipal facilities that the district uses; and
(b)  except for services rendered by the county or municipal legislative body
members, the services that the county or municipality renders to the local
district.
